Hawaii statutes.
[§11-315] Advisory opinions.
The commission may render written advisory opinions upon the request of any
candidate, candidate committee, noncandidate committee, or other person or
entity subject to this part, as to whether the facts and circumstances of a
particular case constitute or will constitute a violation under this part. If
no advisory opinion is rendered within ninety days after all information
necessary to issue an opinion has been obtained, it shall be deemed that an
advisory opinion was rendered and that the facts and circumstances of that
particular case do not constitute a violation under this part. The opinion
rendered or deemed rendered, until amended or revoked, shall be binding on the
commission in any subsequent charges concerning the candidate, any candidate
committee or noncandidate committee, or other person or entity subject to this
part, who sought the opinion and acted in reliance on it in good faith, unless
material facts were omitted or misstated by the requester in the request for an
advisory opinion. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the
commission to issue rules through an advisory opinion. [L 2010, c 211, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next